Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6c. new text end new text begin Speech condition identifier. new text end new text begin (a) Upon the written request of the applicant, the commissioner must issue a driver's license or Minnesota identification card bearing a graphic or written identifier for a speech condition or disorder, including but not limited to stuttering. The commissioner must not include any specific medical information on the driver's license or Minnesota identification card. new text end new text begin (b) On request of the applicant and payment of the required fee, the department must issue a replacement or renewal license or identification card without the designation. new text end